Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:(1) Every person who sells, furnishes, administers, distributes, gives away, or offers to sell, furnish, administer, distribute, or give away a device, canister, tank, or receptacle either exclusively containing nitrous oxide or flavored nitrous oxide or exclusively containing a chemical compound mixed with nitrous oxide, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.(2) This section does not apply to the sale of nitrous oxide for use in medical or dental care, or to any person who administers nitrous oxide for the purpose of providing medical or dental care, if administered by a medical or dental practitioner licensed by this state or at the direction or under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by the state.(3) This section does not apply to the sale of nitrous oxide contained in food products for use as a propellant.(4) This section does not apply to the sale and use of nitrous oxide by a manufacturer as part of a manufacturing process or industrial operation.(5) This section does not apply to the sale and use of nitrous oxide for automotive purposes.(6) As used in this section, "nitrous oxide" refers to any of the following substances: N20, dinitrogen monoxide, dinitrogen oxide, nitrogen oxide, or laughing gas.--- END ---